North Dakota, session 69, HB1395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 47-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Proof of background check provided to tenant.
If a landlord requires a criminal, credit, or other background check as a prerequisite to
executing a rental lease for real property, a prospective tenant may request proof of a
completed background check. Upon a prospective tenant's request for proof of a background
check, the landlord shall furnish proof within fourteen days of the landlord's receipt of the
completed background check. If a landlord fails to timely furnish proof of the background check
to the tenant, the landlord shall refund all fees paid by the prospective tenant to complete the
background check in attempting to secure a lease.
Page No. 1 25.1088.02000